California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(a) If infestation is found in an apiary, the inspector shall notify the owner, broker, or person in charge or possession of the apiary in writing. The notice shall state the nature of the pest infestation found and the manner in which the inspector has marked the hives or any part of the hives that contain evidence of the infestation and shall order the abatement of the infestation within a specified time. No person after receiving notice shall refuse or neglect to abate the infestation within the time specified in the notice or order.

(b) If the inspector, in the inspector’s judgment, believes summary abatement is necessary, the inspector may do so, or require that abatement be performed under the inspector’s direct
 supervision. The inspector may also issue a hold order against the apiary, giving notice that the apiary is held to the owner or bailee and posting a copy of the hold order in a conspicuous place in the apiary. No person, who has been given notice of a hold order, shall move the apiary or any part of the apiary or any other bee equipment from the location unless authorized by the inspector, until the hold order is released.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 683, Sec. 18.   (AB 719)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

29204.

Every infested apiary is a public nuisance. The owner, broker, or person in charge or possession of any apiary, upon finding an infestation to be present, or upon receiving notice an infestation exists in the apiary, shall abate the infestation without undue delay, pursuant to the requirements of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 683, Sec. 19.   (AB 719)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

29205.

The notice may be served upon the broker or the person that has possession or that owns the infested apiary, personally or by certified mail to their last known address. If the owner, broker, or person in charge or possession of any apiary is not known, the notice shall be served by posting it in a conspicuous place in the apiary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 683, Sec. 20.   (AB 719)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

29206.

If the infestation found in an apiary is American foulbrood, the time specified in the notice shall not be less than 24 hours nor more than 48 hours from the time the notice is served, except that the inspector may extend the time limit if necessary to prevent hardship and it can be done without undue danger of spreading the disease.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29207.

If American foulbrood is found in an apiary, the abatement shall be by killing the bees in the infested colonies and disposing of the hives and their contents, together with any other infested comb, hives, and associated appliances which are found in the apiary, in one of the following ways:

(a) By delivery to a licensed wax salvage plant pursuant to this chapter.

(b) By burning in a manner as set forth in Section 29208, the contents of the diseased colonies, including the bees, comb, and associated frames, together with any other diseased combs, and associated frames, which are found in the apiary in one of the following ways and disinfecting by scorching the hive bodies, covers, bottom boards, supers, and appliances associated with them:

(1) Burning in a pit and burying the ashes not less than two feet below the surface of the ground.

(2) Burning in an incinerator approved by the director. This section does not prevent federal and state research agencies from securing, transporting, and maintaining infested bees, comb, hives, appliances, or colonies pursuant to Section 29074.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29208.

(a) If abatement is by burning or hazardous waste disposal, the person abating shall act in accordance with applicable air pollution control district or air quality maintenance district regulations and state and local fire control laws. If the regulations or laws prohibit burning immediately, the diseased colonies shall be sealed and placed in an enclosed structure and thereafter burned on the first date allowed by the regulation or law. All the activities shall be reported to the inspector before burning or disposal, who may require that burning or disposal occur only under the inspector’s supervision.

(b) The inspector’s supervision shall be in addition to, but not in conflict with, the applicable air pollution control
 district or air quality management district regulations and fire control laws. Burning or disposal without the knowledge of the inspector is a violation of this section.

(c) If abatement is by delivery to a licensed wax salvage plant, the person abating shall provide the inspector with information as to the date and location of delivery.

(d) If the inspector determines that abatement by burning or hazardous waste disposal is appropriate, the inspector’s costs for supervising the burning or disposal shall be borne by the beekeeper with the diseased hives.

(e) In lieu of the methods prescribed pursuant to Section 29151, operations to abate diseased colonies may be performed by any hazardous waste facility authorized to operate under Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 25100) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety
 Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 683, Sec. 21.   (AB 719)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

29209.

If the owner, broker, or person in charge or possession of an apiary in which an infestation is found to exist cannot be located after diligent search by the inspector, or if notice has been served pursuant to this article and the owner, broker, or person in charge or possession of the apiary refuses or neglects to abate the infestation within the time that is specified in the notice, the inspector shall abate the infestation within 72 hours after expiration of the time that is specified in the notice. The cost of abatement shall be paid by the owner of the apiary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 683, Sec. 22.   (AB 719)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

29210.

If an abatement notice as required by this article has been served upon the owner or bailee of an apiary, the owner or bailee, before the expiration of the time specified in the notice, may appeal from the inspector’s field determination of the infestation named in the notice by sending a written appeal to the director with a specimen of the infested material chosen and sealed for transportation jointly by the owner or bailee and the inspector, which is accompanied by a statement signed by the owner or bailee and the inspector, attesting to the fact that such specimen was obtained from the portion of the apiary described in the abatement notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29211.

In those instances when the inspector has sealed the infested hive after making a field determination, if a beekeeper appeals the inspector’s field determination, the owner or bailee of the apiary and the inspector shall jointly break the seal and take the sample for appeal. If the band is broken in the absence of the inspector, no appeal shall be valid and the infestation shall be abated as described in the abatement notice.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29212.

The specimen shall be subjected to a laboratory diagnosis by the director, or at his or her direction. The written determination which sets forth the findings of the diagnosis is final proof of the nature of the infestation which exists in the apiary.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29213.

The disease which is named by the director in a written response to the appeal may be abated pursuant to this chapter. Pending the determination of the director, the time which is specified in the abatement notice shall be extended by the number of hours between the forwarding of the representative specimen and the receipt of the written determination from the director by the inspector, and the service of a copy of the written determination upon the owner or bailee that made the written appeal. If the owner or bailee cannot be found after due diligence, the extended time shall expire when a copy of the director’s determination is served by posting it in the apiary.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 15. Enforcement and Penalties [29300. - 29313.]

29300.

The director, and the commissioner of each county under the direction and supervision of the director shall enforce this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29301.

The director may make any regulations that are reasonable and necessary to carry out this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29302.

(a) Unless otherwise stated, it shall be an infraction for any person to fail to comply with any requirement of this chapter, or regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter, after a warning notice of seven days is given. However, there shall be no warning notice for infractions involving the following sections:

(1) Subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 29046.

(2) Subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 29056.

(3) Section 29072.

(4) Section 29111.

(5) Section 29113.

(6) Section 29120.

(7) Section 29126.

(8) Section 29127.

(9) Section 29145.

(10) Section 29150.

(11) Section 29170.

(12) Section 29171.

(13) Section 29172.

(14) Section 29173.

(15) Section 29204.

(b) Violations shall be referred to the district attorney in the affected county, or to the Attorney General if the district attorney is not able to prosecute the
 matter. For purposes of this chapter, each incident shall constitute a separate infraction. When violations of provisions governing hives or colonies are involved, each separate hive or colony shall constitute a separate infraction. Notwithstanding any other law, the maximum penalty of each infraction shall be one hundred dollars ($100) for the first hive or colony, plus one dollar ($1) for each additional hive or colony not in compliance, as applicable to a maximum penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), except that a violation of Section 29070 or 29070.5 shall be subject to a maximum fifty dollar ($50) fine. This section does not prevent the secretary or the commissioner from initiating any procedures for issuance of a prior warning notice or notice to correct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 122.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

29303.

It shall be an infraction for any person to fail to comply with any notice or order which is issued pursuant to this chapter subject to the penalties set forth in Section 29302.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29304.

(a) In addition to the penalties outlined in Sections 12999.5, 29302, and 29303, any person not complying with this chapter, a regulation adopted thereto, or any notice or order issued pursuant to this chapter or regulation, shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each day that the violation continues.

(b) The secretary or commissioner may also seek injunctive relief against any person operating in violation of this chapter or
 regulations adopted thereto, or violation of any order or notice issued pursuant to the authority of this chapter or regulation adopted thereto.

(c) Any action for recovery of civil penalties or injunctive relief shall be referred to the Attorney General.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 854, Sec. 2.   (AB 1752)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

29305.

(a) Any penalties recovered under this chapter, whether criminal or civil, shall be paid into a special account maintained by the department, and shall be used for the administration of Section 29302, except that up to 50 percent of the costs incurred by a district attorney in prosecuting a case under Section 29302 shall be reimbursed from whatever penalties are obtained from the prosecution.

(b) In determining the amount of any civil or criminal penalty provided for in this chapter, the court shall consider the seriousness of the conduct, and all relevant circumstances including, but not limited to, the extent of the harm caused by the conduct; the motive and persistence of the conduct; the length of time over which the conduct occurred; the economic impact on the person involved, whether a corporation or an individual; and any corrective action taken by the person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29306.

In addition to any other penalty provided for by law, and by this article, any person who willfully or intentionally violates any provisions of this chapter shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each violation, which shall be recovered in a civil action brought in the name of the people of the State of California by the Attorney General.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29307.

Any person who violates any injunctive order issued pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 29304 shall be subject to a civil penalty, in addition to any other penalty provided for by law, not to exceed six thousand dollars ($6,000). Where the conduct constituting a violation is of a continuing nature, each day of violative conduct shall be a separate and distinct violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29308.

The director shall appoint a supervisor of apiary inspection and such qualified state apiary inspectors as may be necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29309.

Each commissioner is an ex officio state apiary inspector and may appoint one or more inspectors, qualified pursuant to the regulations of the director, to be county apiary inspectors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29310.

The director may assign one or more qualified state apiary inspectors to perform the duties of a county apiary inspector in any county for such time and rate of compensation as may be determined by agreement with the board of supervisors pursuant to Section 482. The state apiary inspector shall be under the direction and supervision of the commissioner if there is a commissioner in the county to which the inspector is assigned.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1404, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29311.

The penalties prescribed by this chapter are exclusive and no other civil penalties may be assessed, except as specified in Section 12999.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 854, Sec. 3.   (AB 1752)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

29312.

In any civil action for the wrongful and willful taking, possessing, harboring, or transporting of a beehive, for the wrongful and willful removal of bees from their beehive, or for the wrongful and willful killing or destroying of bees without the consent of the owner or the person lawfully in possession of those bees, the damage caused to the plaintiff shall be three times the value of the bees at the time of the taking, possessing, harboring, transporting,
 destroying, or vandalizing of the bees, plus an amount in fair compensation for the time and money properly expended by the plaintiff in recovering or replacing the bees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 138, Sec. 2.   (AB 2755)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

29313.

(a) In lieu of prosecution, and in addition to any other penalty that is provided in this chapter, the secretary or the commissioner may impose an administrative civil penalty on a person who violates Article 4 (commencing with Section 29040) or Article 5 (commencing with Section 29070), Article 10 (commencing with Section 29671) of Chapter 2, or any regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter to implement those articles.

(b) An administrative civil penalty imposed pursuant to this section shall be levied in proportion to the violation, measured as either “serious,” “moderate,” or “minor.”

(1) “Serious” violations are repeat or intentional violations, punishable by an administrative civil penalty of
 not less than four hundred one dollars ($401) and up to a maximum of one thousand dollars ($1,000) per violation.

(2) “Moderate” violations are repeat violations or violations that are not intentional, punishable by an administrative civil penalty of not less than one hundred fifty-one dollars ($151), but not more than four hundred dollars ($400) per violation.

(3) “Minor” violations are violations that are procedural in nature, punishable by an administrative civil penalty of not less than fifty dollars ($50), but not more than one hundred fifty dollars ($150) per violation.

(c) Before an administrative civil penalty is imposed pursuant to this section, the person charged with the violation shall receive written notice of the proposed action, including the nature of the violation and, if applicable, the amount of
 the proposed civil penalty. The person shall have the right to request a hearing within 20 days after receiving notice of the proposed action. A notice that is sent by certified mail to the last known address of the person charged shall be considered received even if delivery is refused or if the notice is not accepted at that address. If a hearing is requested, notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be given at least 10 days before the date set for the hearing. At the hearing, the person shall be given an opportunity to review the secretary’s or the commissioner’s evidence and to present evidence on the person’s own behalf. If a hearing is not timely requested, the secretary or the commissioner may take the action proposed without a hearing.

(d) If the person, upon whom the commissioner imposed an administrative civil penalty, requested and appeared at a hearing, the person may appeal the commissioner’s decision to the secretary
 within 30 days of the date of receiving a copy of the commissioner’s decision. The following procedures apply to the appeal:

(1) The appeal shall be in writing and signed by the appellant or the appellant’s authorized agent, state the grounds for the appeal, and include a copy of the commissioner’s decision. The appellant shall file a copy of the appeal with the commissioner at the same time it is filed with the secretary.

(2) The appellant and the commissioner, at the time of filing the appeal or within 10 days thereafter or at a later time prescribed by the secretary, may present the record of the hearing and a written argument to the secretary stating the ground for affirming, modifying, or reversing the commissioner’s decision.

(3) The secretary may grant oral arguments upon application made at the time written
 arguments are filed.

(4) If an application to present an oral argument is granted, written notice of the time and place for the oral argument shall be given at least 10 days before the date set therefor. The times may be altered by mutual agreement of the appellant, the commissioner, and the secretary.

(5) The secretary shall decide the appeal on the record of the hearing, including the written evidence and the written argument described in paragraph (2), that the secretary has received. If the secretary finds substantial evidence in the record to support the commissioner’s decision, the secretary shall affirm the decision.

(6) The secretary shall render a written decision within 45 days of the date of appeal or within 15 days of the date of oral arguments or as soon thereafter as practical.

(7) On an appeal pursuant to this section, the secretary may affirm the commissioner’s decision, modify the commissioner’s decision by reducing or increasing the amount of the civil penalty levied, if applicable, so that it is within the secretary’s guidelines for imposing administrative civil penalties, or reverse the commissioner’s decision. Any civil penalty increased by the secretary shall not be higher than that proposed in the commissioner’s notice of proposed action given pursuant to subdivision (c). A copy of the secretary’s decision shall be delivered or mailed to the appellant and the commissioner.

(8) Any person who does not request a hearing with the commissioner pursuant to a civil penalty imposed under subdivision (c) may not file an appeal to the secretary pursuant to this subdivision.

(9) Review of a
 decision of the secretary may be sought by the appellant within 30 days of the date of the decision pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(e) After the exhaustion of the appeal and review of procedures provided in this section, the commissioner, or the commissioner’s representative, may file a certified copy of a final decision of the commissioner that directs the payment of a civil penalty, and, if applicable, a copy of any decision of the secretary, or the secretary’s authorized representative, rendered on an appeal from the commissioner’s decision and a copy of any order that denies a petition for a writ of administrative mandamus, with the clerk of the superior court of any county. Judgment shall be entered immediately by the clerk in conformity with the decision or order. No fees shall be charged by the clerk of the superior court for the performance of any official service required in connection with the entry of
 judgment pursuant to this section.

(f) In addition to the administrative civil penalties prescribed in subdivision (b), the appellant may be required to cover the cost of the administrative hearing unless the decision of the secretary or the commissioner is overturned.

(g) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2021.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 683, Sec. 23.   (AB 719)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 16. Africanized Honey Bees [29320. - 29322.]

29320.

The secretary, in consultation with the board, may approve programs statewide to train, on a voluntary basis, beekeepers, inspectors, or commissioners in contemporary and geographically relevant colony management, including, but not limited to, the maintenance of colonies free from Africanized honey bees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 683, Sec. 24.   (AB 719)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

29321.

Any hive or comparable apparatus that is not occupied by a live bee colony, and that is accessible to bees, is a public nuisance. The hive or apparatus shall be subject to abatement in the manner provided for in Article 14 (commencing with Section 29200).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 143, Sec. 1.   (AB 861)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

29322.

(a) The governing board of a city, county, or city and county may, by ordinance, establish procedures for the abatement of a hive or comparable apparatus where Africanized or overly defensive honey bees are present.

(b) In the absence of a local ordinance adopted pursuant to subdivision (a), if a commissioner determines that the presence of Africanized
 or overly defensive honey bees in a hive is a public nuisance
 or if Africanized or overly defensive honey bees from a hive are entering land other than the land upon which the hive is located so as to endanger the public health, safety, or welfare or so as to create an unreasonable interference with the use of the property of others, the commissioner may take any action necessary to abate the public nuisance, including, but not limited to, moving, selling, destroying, or otherwise disposing of the infested hive in accordance with local administrative procedures.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 143, Sec. 2.   (AB 861)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Honey [29401. - 29735.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [29401. - 29421.]

29401.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29402.

“Adulterated honey” means any honey to which has been added honeydew, glucose, dextrose, molasses, sugar, sugar sirup, invert sugar, or any other similar product except the nectar of floral exudations of plants gathered and stored in the comb by honeybees.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29403.

“Agent” includes broker, commission merchant, auctioneer, solicitor, seller on consignment, and any other person that is acting upon the actual or implied authority of another.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29404.

“Clean and sound containers” means containers which are virtually free from rust, stains, or leaks.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29405.

“Comb honey” means honey which is in the comb.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29406.

“Container” means any box, crate, chest, carton, barrel, keg, or other receptacle which contains honey.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29407.

“Crystallized honey” means honey which has assumed a solid form due to the crystallization of one or more of the natural sugars in it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29408.

“Deceptive arrangement” or “deceptive display” means any lot, load, arrangement, or display of honey which has in any exposed surface, honey which is so superior in quality, appearance, or condition, or in any other respects, to any of the honey which is concealed or unexposed as to materially misrepresent any part of the lot, load, arrangement, or display.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29409.

“Deceptive pack” means any container or subcontainer of honey which has, in any exposed surface, honey or honeycomb, so superior in quality, appearance, condition, or in any other respect to the honey in the interior of the container or subcontainer, or the unexposed portion, as to materially misrepresent the contents. It includes any pack:

(a) Even though the honey in a container is virtually uniform in quality as defined in this chapter, if the outer or exposed surface is composed of honey which is not an accurate representation of the variation in quality of the honey in the entire container.

(b) Which is slack-filled, unless the container is so marked, even though such container is marked with the proper net weight of the honey which it contains.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29409.5.

“Domestic honey” means comb or extracted honey produced within one of the states of the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 587.)
-------------------------------------------

29410.

“Extracted honey” means honey which has been removed from the comb.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29412.

“Foreign material” means wax particles, insects, or other materials which were not deposited by bees. It does not, however, include decorative artificial leaves or blossoms.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29413.

(a) “Honey” means the natural sweet substance produced by honeybees from the nectar of plants or from secretions of living parts of plants or excretions of plant sucking insects on the living parts of plants, which the bees collect, transform by combining with specific substances of their own, deposit, dehydrate, store, and leave in the honeycomb to ripen and mature.

(b) “Blossom honey” or “nectar honey” means the honey that comes from nectars of plants.

(c) “Honeydew honey” means the honey that comes mainly from excretions of plant sucking insects (Hemiptera) on living parts of plants or secretions of living parts of plants.

(d) Honey consists essentially of different sugars, predominantly fructose and glucose as well as other substances such as organic acids, enzymes, and solid particles derived from honey collection. The color of honey can vary from nearly colorless to dark brown. The consistency can be fluid, viscous, or partially to completely crystallized. The flavor and aroma vary, but are derived from plant origin.

(e) Honey sold as described in subdivision (d) shall not have added to it any food ingredient, including food additives, nor shall any other additions be made other than honey. Honey shall not have any objectionable matter, flavor, aroma, or taint absorbed from foreign matter during its processing and storage. Honey shall not have begun to ferment or effervesce and no pollen or
 constituent particular to honey may be removed except where unavoidable in the removal of foreign inorganic or organic matter.

(f) Honey shall meet the following standards:

(1) Honey shall not be heated or processed to such an extent that its essential composition is changed or its quality is impaired.

(2) Chemical or biochemical treatments shall not be used to influence honey crystallization.

(3) Honey shall not contain more than 20 percent moisture content and for heather honey not more than 23 percent.

(4) Honey shall contain not less than 60 percent fructose and glucose, combined.

(5) Honeydew honey and blends of honeydew
 honey with blossom honey shall not contain less than 45 percent fructose and glucose, combined.

(6) Blossom honey shall not contain more than 5 percent sucrose, except for the following:

(A) Alfalfa (Medicago saliva), citrus spp., false acacia (Robinia pseudoacacia), French honeysuckle (Hedysarum), Menzies banksias (Banksia menziesii), red gum (Eucalyptus camaldulensis), leatherwood (Eucryphia lucida), and Eucryphia milligani may contain up to 10 percent sucrose.

(B) Lavender (Lavandula spp.) and borage (Borago officinalis) may contain up to 15 percent sucrose.

(7) The water insoluble solids content for honey other than pressed honey shall not be more than 0.1g/100g. The content for pressed honey shall not be more than
 0.5g/100g.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 388, Sec. 1.   (AB 1216)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

29414.

“Honeybees” means honey-producing insects of the genus Apis mellifica.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29415.

“Honeydew” means the dextrorotatory saccharine exudation of plants or insects, except nectareous exudations, which is gathered and stored in the comb by honeybees.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29415.5.

“Imported honey” means comb or extracted honey imported from any territory or foreign county or honey which is repackaged into subcontainers as a blend with honey imported from one or more other countries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 587.)
-------------------------------------------

29416.

“Mislabeled” means the placing or presence of any false or misleading statement, design, or device upon, or in connection with, any container or lot of honey, or upon the label, lining, or wrapper of any such container, or any placard used in connection with any container or lot of honey, which has reference to such honey. A statement, design, or device is false and misleading, if the honey to which it apparently or actually refers does not conform in every respect to such statement.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29417.

“Pack,” or “packing” or “packed,” means the arrangement of all or a part of the subcontainers in any container.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29418.

“Placard” means any sign, label, or designation, except an oral designation, which is used in connection with any honey as a description or identification of it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29419.

“Section box” means the wood or other frame in which bees have built a small comb of honey.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29420.

“Slack-filled” means that the contents of any container occupy less than 85 percent of the volume of the closed container.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29421.

“Subcontainer” means any section box or other receptacle which is used within a container.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [29441. - 29451.]

29441.

The director and the commissioners of each county of the state, their deputies and inspectors, under the supervision and control of the director shall enforce this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29442.

The refusal of any officer who is authorized pursuant to this chapter to carry out the orders and directions of the director in the enforcement of this chapter is neglect of duty.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29443.

The director may do all of the following:

(a) Prescribe by regulation methods of selecting samples of lots or containers of honey, which shall be reasonably calculated to produce by such sampling fair representations of the entire lots or containers sampled.

(b) Establish by regulation and issue official color charts which depict the color standards and requirements established in this chapter.

(c) Make such other regulations as are reasonably necessary to secure uniformity in the enforcement of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29444.

Any sample which is taken pursuant to this chapter is prima facie evidence of the true condition of the entire lot in the examination of which the sample was taken. The presumption established by this paragraph is a presumption affecting the burden of proof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 262.)
-------------------------------------------

29445.

An enforcing officer may do all of the following:

(a) Enter and inspect any place or conveyance within the county or district over which he has jurisdiction, where any honey is produced, stored, packed, delivered for shipment, loaded, shipped, being transported, or sold.

(b) Inspect all honey and the containers of honey and equipment which is found in any place or conveyance which he is authorized to enter and inspect.

(c) Take for inspection, such representative samples of the honey and such containers, as may be necessary to determine whether or not this chapter has been violated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29446.

An enforcing officer shall cause the prosecution of any person whom he knows or has reason to believe is guilty of violating any provision of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29447.

Any enforcement officer may, while enforcing this chapter, seize and hold as evidence all or any part of any pack, load, bulk lot, consignment, or shipment of honey packed, delivered for shipment, loaded, shipped, or being transported, or sold in violation of this chapter, or any container of such product, as may in his judgment be necessary to secure the conviction of the party he knows or believes has violated or is violating any provision of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29448.

If any markings are used or required to be used by this chapter on any container of honey to identify the container or describe its contents, the markings shall be plainly and conspicuously marked, stamped, stenciled, printed, labeled, or branded in the English language, unless the container is intended for and is shipped outside of the United States, in letters which are large enough to be readily discernible by any person, upon the top, front, or side of the container. If the marking is on a placard which is used in a display, the placard shall be placed or posted in such a position that there is no doubt as to the product which it is to identify.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29449.

Any person, forwarding company, or common carrier may decline to ship or transport any honey if notified by any enforcing officer of this chapter, that the honey is found to be delivered for shipment in violation of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29450.

Any person, forwarding company, or common carrier may reserve the right, in any receipt, bill of lading or other writing which is given to the consignor of any honey, to reject for shipment and to return to the consignor or hold at his expense and risk all honey, which, upon inspection, is found to be delivered for shipment in violation of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29451.

Honey may not be labeled honey or words of similar import or represented to be honey unless manufactured by bees. No product may be labeled imitation honey or words of similar import or represented to be imitation honey.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 745.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Exemptions [29471. - 29474.]

29471.

If the requirements prescribed by this article are satisfied, all of the following ungraded honey is exempt from the remaining provisions of this chapter:

(a) Honey which is intended to be used in commercial processing, as for clarifying and packing in retail or wholesale containers.

(b) Honey which is intended for the manufacture of honey products for resale. 

(c) Honey which is being delivered to any person for grading, packing, processing, or reconditioning.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29472.

The containers of the ungraded honey shall not bear any false or misleading statements or be deceptively packed

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

29473.

The owner or person in possession of the ungraded honey shall, on demand of any enforcing officer under this chapter, give to the officer a sworn statement in writing, which was made before a notary public, that specifies all of the following:

(a) That the honey will be disposed of or used pursuant to this article.

(b) The name and address of the person to whom such honey is to be delivered. 

(c) An accurate identification of the honey.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)